Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh S.F. 2131 Section 1. Section 6B.2A, subsection 2, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 The acquiring agency shall cause a notice to be published 3 once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or 4 city where the agricultural land is located. The notice shall 5 be published as provided in chapter 618 at least four but no 6 more than twenty days before the public hearing is held as 7 referred to in subsection 1 . The published notice shall, at a 8 minimum, include the following information: 9 Sec. 2. Section 6B.4, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, 10 is amended to read as follows: 11 b. The chief judge or the judgeâs designee shall name a 12 chairperson from the persons selected and may appoint such 13 alternate members and chairpersons to the commission as are 14 deemed necessary and appropriate under the circumstances. A 15 person shall not be selected as a member or alternate member 16 of the compensation commission if the person possesses any 17 interest in the proceeding which would cause the person to 18 render a biased decision. The applicant shall mail a copy 19 of the list of commissioners and alternates appointed by the 20 chief judge by certified mail to the property owner at the 21 ownerâs last known address. The applicant shall also cause 22 the list of commissioners and alternates to be published 23 once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county as 24 provided in chapter 618 , not less than four nor more than 25 twenty days before the meeting of the compensation commission 26 to assess the damages. Service of the list of commissioners 27 and alternates by publication shall be deemed complete on the 28 day of publication. In lieu of mailing and publishing the list 29 of commissioners and alternates, the applicant may cause the 30 list to be served upon the owner of the property in the manner 31 provided by the Iowa rules of civil procedure for the personal 32 service of original notice. The list of commissioners and 33 alternates shall be mailed and published or served, as above 34 provided, prior to or contemporaneously with service of the 35 -1- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 1/ 51 S.F. 2131 notice of assessment as provided in section 6B.8 . 1 Sec. 3. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 2 subparagraphs (1), (2), and (3), Code 2026, are amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (1) If the political subdivision is a county, notice of the 5 public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor more 6 than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county newspapers 7 selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 618 . 8 (2) If the political subdivision is a city, notice of the 9 public hearing shall be published pursuant to section 362.3 in 10 a newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 11 circulation in the city. However, if the city has with a 12 population of two hundred or less, publication may be made by 13 posting in three public places in the city. 14 (3) If the political subdivision is a school district, 15 notice of the public hearing shall be published not less 16 than ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in 17 a newspaper published in the school district, if any, and if 18 not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the school 19 district as provided in chapter 618 . 20 Sec. 4. Section 24.9, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 21 is amended to read as follows: 22 a. Each municipality shall file with the secretary or clerk 23 thereof the estimates required to be made in sections 24.3 24 through 24.8 , at least twenty days before the date fixed by 25 law for certifying the same to the levying board and shall 26 forthwith fix a date for a hearing on the estimates, and 27 shall publish such estimates and any annual levies previously 28 authorized as provided in section 76.2 , with a notice of the 29 time when and the place where such hearing shall be held not 30 less than ten nor more than twenty days before the hearing. 31 Provided that in municipalities of less than two hundred 32 population such estimates and the notice of hearing shall 33 be posted in three public places in the district in lieu of 34 publication. For any other municipality such Such publication 35 -2- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 2/ 51 S.F. 2131 shall be in a newspaper published in the municipality, if any, 1 if not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the 2 municipality as provided in chapter 618 . 3 Sec. 5. Section 26A.3, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, 4 is amended to read as follows: 5 b. The request for statements of qualifications shall be 6 posted not less than thirteen and not more than forty-five days 7 before the date for response in a relevant contractor plan room 8 service with statewide circulation, in a relevant construction 9 lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on 10 an internet site sponsored by either a governmental entity 11 or a statewide association that represents the governmental 12 entity as provided in chapter 618 . If circumstances beyond 13 the control of the governmental entity require postponement 14 and there are no changes to the projectâs contract documents, 15 a notice of the revised date shall be posted not less than 16 four and not more than forty-five days before the revised 17 date for answering the request for proposals and statements 18 of qualifications in a relevant contractor plan room service 19 with statewide circulation, in a relevant construction lead 20 generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 21 internet site sponsored by either a government entity or a 22 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 23 as provided in chapter 618 . 24 Sec. 6. Section 26A.3, subsection 5, paragraph a, 25 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 (1) The construction manager-at-risk shall prepare a 27 request for statements of qualifications. The request shall 28 include general information on the project site, project 29 scope, schedule, selection criteria, and the time and place 30 for receipt of statements of qualifications. The construction 31 manager-at-risk shall provide public notice of the request for 32 statements of qualifications in a relevant contractor plan room 33 service with statewide circulation, a relevant construction 34 lead generating service with statewide circulation, and on an 35 -3- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 3/ 51 S.F. 2131 internet site sponsored by either a governmental entity or a 1 statewide association that represents the governmental entity 2 as provided in chapter 618 . The request for statements of 3 qualifications shall be posted not less than thirteen and not 4 more than forty-five days before the date for response. 5 Sec. 7. Section 28A.5, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 6 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 Upon petition of eligible electors of a metropolitan area 8 equal in number to at least ten percent of the persons who 9 voted in the last general election held in the metropolitan 10 area for the office of president of the United States or 11 governor, the governing body of the county shall adopt a 12 resolution signifying its intention to initiate the question 13 of participating in the creation of an authority and shall 14 publish the resolution at least once in a newspaper of general 15 circulation in the metropolitan area as provided in chapter 618 16 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 17 metropolitan areaâs entry into the authority. The resolution 18 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 19 hearing, and shall contain all of the following information: 20 Sec. 8. Section 28A.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 3. The board shall set a time and place for a public hearing 23 on the budget before the final certification date and shall 24 publish notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more than 25 twenty days prior to the hearing in one or more newspapers 26 serving the greater metropolitan area as provided in chapter 27 618 . Proof of publication shall be filed with and preserved 28 by the treasurer. 29 Sec. 9. Section 28A.21, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 2. A proposed action of the board, and a proposed 32 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 33 body of the owner of the facilities. If the governing body 34 of a county, city, commission, or authority desires to sell, 35 -4- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 4/ 51 S.F. 2131 lease, lend, grant, or convey to the authority a facility 1 or any part of a facility, the governing body shall adopt a 2 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 3 the resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 4 circulation in the county and in a newspaper or newspapers, if 5 necessary, of general circulation in the area served by the 6 county, city, commission, or authority as provided in chapter 7 618 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of 8 the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. The resolution 9 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 10 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, the 11 county, city, commission, or authority shall enact an ordinance 12 authorizing the sale, lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 13 Sec. 10. Section 28J.9, subsection 18, paragraph d, 14 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 (1) If a contract is to be negotiated and awarded without 16 competitive bidding for the reason set forth in paragraph âcâ , 17 subparagraph (2), the port authority shall publish a notice 18 calling for technical proposals at least twice, with at least 19 seven days between publications, in a newspaper of general 20 circulation in the area of the port authority as provided in 21 chapter 618 . After receipt of the technical proposals, the 22 port authority may negotiate with and award a contract for the 23 improvement to the person making the proposal considered to be 24 the most advantageous to the port authority. 25 Sec. 11. Section 37.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 37.4 Notice. 28 Notice of the election shall be given by publication in one 29 newspaper published or having general circulation in the city 30 as provided in section 362.3 as provided in chapter 618 . The 31 notice shall state the purpose of the memorial proposed as 32 outlined in section 37.18 . 33 Sec. 12. Section 49.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -5- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 5/ 51 S.F. 2131 2. The board of supervisors or city council shall publish 1 notice of changes in the county or city precinct boundaries 2 in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county 3 or city as provided in chapter 618 once each week for three 4 consecutive weeks. The series of publications shall be made 5 after the changes in the precincts have been approved by 6 the state commissioner of elections. The last of the three 7 publications shall be made no later than thirty days before the 8 next general election. A map showing the new boundaries may be 9 used. No publication is necessary if no changes were made. 10 Sec. 13. Section 49.53, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 2. The notice shall be published in at least one newspaper, 13 as defined in section 618.3 , which is published in the county 14 or other political subdivision in which the election is to 15 occur or, if no newspaper is published there, in at least 16 one newspaper of substantial circulation in the county or 17 political subdivision as provided in chapter 618 . For the 18 general election or the primary election the foregoing notice 19 shall be published in at least two newspapers published in the 20 county. However, if there is only one newspaper published in 21 the county, publication in one newspaper shall be sufficient. 22 Sec. 14. Section 69.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 2. If the status of an officeholder is in question, the 25 entity or officer responsible for making an appointment to 26 fill the vacancy shall decide whether a vacancy exists. The 27 appointing entity or officer may act upon its own motion. If 28 a petition signed by twenty-five registered voters of the 29 jurisdiction is received, the appointing entity or officer 30 shall convene within thirty days to consider whether a vacancy 31 exists. The appointing entity or officer shall publish notice 32 as provided in chapter 618 that a public hearing will be held 33 to determine whether a vacancy exists. The notice shall 34 include the time and place of the hearing and the name of the 35 -6- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 6/ 51 S.F. 2131 office and the officeholder whose status is in question. The 1 public hearing shall be held not less than four nor more than 2 fourteen days after publication of the notice. The officer 3 whose status is in question shall be notified of the time 4 and place of the hearing. Notice shall be sent by certified 5 mail and must be postmarked at least fourteen days before the 6 hearing. No later than seven days after the public hearing, 7 the appointing entity or officer shall publish its decision. 8 If the appointing entity or officer decides that the office 9 is vacant, the publication shall state the date the vacancy 10 occurred and what action will be taken to fill the vacancy. 11 Sec. 15. Section 73A.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 73A.12 Issuance of bonds ââ notice. 14 Before any municipality shall institute proceedings for 15 the issuance of any bonds or other evidence of indebtedness 16 payable from taxation, excepting such bonds or other evidence 17 of indebtedness as have been authorized by a vote of the people 18 of such municipality, and except such bonds or obligations 19 as it may be by law compelled to issue, a notice of such 20 action, including a statement of the amount and purpose of said 21 bonds or other evidence of indebtedness shall be published 22 at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within 23 such municipality as provided in chapter 618 at least ten days 24 before the meeting at which it is proposed to issue such bonds. 25 Sec. 16. Section 74A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 2. The treasurer may offer the warrants for public sale at 28 par, by publishing notice of the sale for two consecutive weeks 29 in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction of 30 the school district issuing the warrants as provided in chapter 31 618 , giving not less than ten daysâ notice of the time and 32 place of the sale. The notice shall include a statement of the 33 amount of the warrants offered for sale. 34 Sec. 17. Section 75.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -7- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 7/ 51 S.F. 2131 follows: 1 75.2 Notice of sale. 2 When public bonds are offered for sale, the official in 3 charge of the bond issue shall, by advertisement published 4 at least once, the last one of which shall be not less than 5 four nor more than twenty days before the sale in a newspaper 6 located in the county or a county contiguous to the place of 7 sale as provided in chapter 618 , give notice of the time and 8 place of sale of the bonds, the amount to be offered for sale, 9 and any further information which the official deems pertinent. 10 Sec. 18. Section 80.39, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. Personal property, except for motor vehicles subject to 13 sale pursuant to section 321.89 , and seizable property subject 14 to disposition pursuant to chapter 809 or 809A , which personal 15 property is found or seized by, turned in to, or otherwise 16 lawfully comes into the possession of the department or a local 17 law enforcement agency and which the department or agency does 18 not own, shall be disposed of pursuant to this section . If by 19 examining the property the owner or lawful custodian of the 20 property is known or can be readily ascertained, the department 21 or agency shall notify the owner or custodian by certified mail 22 directed to the ownerâs or custodianâs last known address, as 23 to the location of the property. If the identity or address of 24 the owner cannot be determined, notice by one publication in a 25 newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property 26 was found as provided in chapter 618 is sufficient notice. A 27 published notice may contain multiple items. 28 Sec. 19. Section 137.104, subsection 1, paragraph b, 29 subparagraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4), Code 2026, are amended 30 to read as follows: 31 (1) Rules of a city board shall become effective upon 32 approval by the city council and publication in a newspaper 33 having general circulation in the city as provided in chapter 34 618 . 35 -8- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 8/ 51 S.F. 2131 (2) Rules of a county board shall become effective upon 1 approval by the county board of supervisors by a motion or 2 resolution as defined in section 331.101, subsection 13 , and 3 publication in a newspaper having general circulation in the 4 county as provided in chapter 618 . 5 (3) Rules of a district board shall become effective upon 6 approval by the district board and publication in a newspaper 7 having general circulation in the district as provided in 8 chapter 618 . 9 (4) Before approving any rule or regulation the local board 10 of health shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rule. 11 Any citizen may appear and be heard at the public hearing. A 12 notice of the public hearing, stating the time and place and 13 the general nature of the proposed rule or regulation shall be 14 published in a newspaper having general circulation as provided 15 in section 331.305 in the area served by the local board of 16 health chapter 618 . 17 Sec. 20. Section 145A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 145A.5 Order of approval. 20 When a plan is approved, the officials approving the plan 21 shall jointly issue an order of approval. The order shall 22 specify the area to be merged, the maximum rate of tax to 23 be levied for debt service and operation and maintenance of 24 the proposed area hospital in the portion of the merged area 25 within each political subdivision, the proposed location of 26 the hospital building, the estimated cost of the establishment 27 of the hospital, and any other details concerning the 28 establishment and operation of the hospital the officials 29 deem pertinent. The order shall be published in one or more 30 newspapers which have general circulation within the merged 31 area as provided in chapter 618 once each week for three 32 consecutive weeks , but the newspapers selected need not be 33 published in the merged area . The published order shall 34 contain a notice to the residents of each subdivision of the 35 -9- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 9/ 51 S.F. 2131 proposed merged area that if the residents fail to protest as 1 provided in this chapter , the order shall be deemed approved 2 upon the expiration of a sixty-day period following the date 3 of the last published notice. 4 Sec. 21. Section 161A.3, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 8. âDue noticeâ means notice published at least twice, 7 with an interval of at least six days between the two 8 publication dates, in a newspaper or other publication of 9 general circulation within the appropriate area; or, if no 10 such publication of general circulation be available, by 11 posting at a reasonable number of conspicuous places within 12 the appropriate area, such posting to include, where possible, 13 posting at public places where it may be customary to post 14 notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally as 15 provided in chapter 618 . At any hearing held pursuant to 16 such notice, at the time and place designated in such notice, 17 adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity 18 of renewing such notice for such adjourned dates. 19 Sec. 22. Section 161A.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 161A.16 Publication of notice. 22 The notice of hearing on the formation of a subdistrict shall 23 be by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in 24 some newspaper of general circulation published in the county 25 or district as provided in chapter 618 , the last of which shall 26 be not less than ten days prior to the day set for the hearing 27 on the petition. Proof of such service shall be made by 28 affidavit of the publisher, and be on file with the secretary 29 of the district at the time the hearing begins. 30 Sec. 23. Section 161A.45, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 161A.45 Submission of regulations to division ââ hearing. 33 Regulations which the commissioners propose to adopt, 34 amend, or repeal shall be submitted to the division, in a form 35 -10- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 10/ 51 S.F. 2131 prescribed by the division, for its approval. The division may 1 approve the regulations as submitted, or with amendments as 2 it deems necessary. The commissioners shall, after approval, 3 publish notice of hearing on the proposed regulations, as 4 approved, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district 5 as provided in chapter 618 , setting a date and time not less 6 than ten nor more than thirty days after the publication when a 7 hearing on the proposed regulations will be held at a specified 8 place. The notice shall include the full text of the proposed 9 regulations or shall state that the proposed regulations are 10 on file and available for review at the office of the affected 11 soil and water conservation district. 12 Sec. 24. Section 173.14B, subsection 9, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 9. The board shall publish a notice of intention to 15 issue bonds or notes in a newspaper published and of general 16 circulation in the state as provided in chapter 618 . The 17 notice shall include a statement of the maximum amount of 18 bonds or notes proposed to be issued, and in general, what 19 net revenues will be pledged to pay the bonds or notes and 20 interest on them. An action shall not be brought questioning 21 the legality of the bonds or notes, the power of the board to 22 issue the bonds or notes, or the legality of any proceedings 23 in connection with the authorization or issuance of the bonds 24 or notes after sixty days from the date of publication of the 25 notice. 26 Sec. 25. Section 174.17, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. A fair may institute proceedings for the issuance 29 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 30 bonds to be published at least once in a newspaper of general 31 circulation within the county as provided in chapter 618 at 32 least ten days prior to the meeting at which the fair proposes 33 to take action for the issuance of the bonds. The notice shall 34 include a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, the 35 -11- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 11/ 51 S.F. 2131 maximum rate of interest the bonds are to bear, and the right 1 to petition for an election. 2 Sec. 26. Section 182.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 1. The secretary shall give notice of the referendum on 5 the question of whether to establish an Iowa sheep and wool 6 promotion board and to impose the assessment by publishing the 7 notice for a period of not less than five days in at least one 8 newspaper of general circulation in the state as provided in 9 chapter 618 . The notice shall state the voting places, period 10 of time for voting, and other information deemed necessary by 11 the secretary. 12 Sec. 27. Section 257.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. An instructional support program that provides 15 additional funding for school districts is established. A 16 board of directors that wishes to consider participating in 17 the instructional support program shall hold a public hearing 18 on the question of participation. The board shall set forth 19 its proposal, including the method that will be used to fund 20 the program, in a resolution and shall publish the notice of 21 the time and place of a public hearing on the resolution. 22 Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be 23 published not less than ten nor more than twenty days before 24 the public hearing in a newspaper which is a newspaper of 25 general circulation in the school district as provided in 26 chapter 618 . At the hearing, or no later than thirty days 27 after the date of the hearing, the board shall take action 28 to adopt a resolution to participate in the instructional 29 support program for a period not exceeding five years or to 30 direct the county commissioner of elections to submit the 31 question of participation in the program for a period not 32 exceeding ten years to the registered voters of the school 33 district at an election held on a date specified in section 34 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . If the board submits the 35 -12- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 12/ 51 S.F. 2131 question at an election and a majority of those voting on the 1 question favors participation in the program, the board shall 2 adopt a resolution to participate and certify the results of 3 the election to the department of management. 4 Sec. 28. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph o, 5 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 (2) Prior to filing a request for supplemental aid or a 7 modified supplemental amount based on the grounds specified 8 in this paragraph, the board of directors shall hold a public 9 hearing on the issue and shall publish the notice of the time 10 and place of the public hearing. Notice of the time and place 11 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 12 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 13 that is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 14 district as provided in chapter 618 . 15 Sec. 29. Section 257B.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 257B.5 Notice ââ sale. 18 When the board of supervisors shall offer for 19 sale the sixteenth section or lands selected in lieu 20 thereof, or any portion of the same, or any part of the 21 five-hundred-thousand-acre grant, the county auditor shall give 22 at least forty daysâ notice, by written or printed notices 23 posted in five public places in the county, two of which shall 24 be in the township in which the land to be sold is situated, 25 and also publish a notice of said sale once each week for two 26 weeks preceding the same in a newspaper published in the county 27 as provided in chapter 618 , describing the land to be sold and 28 the time and place of such sale. At such time and place, or at 29 such other time and place as the sale may be adjourned to, the 30 county auditor shall offer to the highest bidder, subject to 31 the provisions of this chapter , and sell, either for cash or 32 one-third cash and the balance on a credit not exceeding ten 33 years, with interest on the same at the rate of not less than 34 three and one-half percent per annum, to be paid at the office 35 -13- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 13/ 51 S.F. 2131 of the county treasurer of said county on the first day of 1 January in each year, delinquent interest to bear the same rate 2 as the principal. Such county treasurer shall pay to the state 3 treasurer on the first day of February all interest collected. 4 Sec. 30. Section 260C.14, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 12. During the second week of August of each year, publish 7 by one insertion in at least one newspaper published in the 8 merged area as provided in chapter 618 a summarized statement 9 verified by affidavit of the secretary of the board showing 10 the receipts and disbursements of all funds of the community 11 college for the preceding fiscal year. The statement of 12 disbursements shall show the names of the persons, firms, 13 or corporations, and the total amount paid to each during 14 the fiscal year. The board is not required to make the 15 publications and notices required under sections 279.35 and 16 279.36 . 17 Sec. 31. Section 261A.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 261A.25 Notice. 20 The authority shall publish a notice of its intention 21 to issue obligations in a newspaper published in and with 22 general circulation in the state as provided in chapter 618 . 23 The notice shall include a statement of the maximum amount 24 of obligations proposed to be issued, and in general terms, 25 what receipts will be pledged to pay bond service charges on 26 the obligations. An action which questions the legality or 27 validity of the obligations or the power of the authority to 28 issue the obligations or the effectiveness or validity of any 29 proceedings adopted for the authorization or issuance of the 30 obligations shall not be brought after sixty days from the date 31 of publication of the notice. 32 Sec. 32. Section 273.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. Notice of the election shall be published by the area 35 -14- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 14/ 51 S.F. 2131 education agency administrator not later than September 15 of 1 the odd-numbered year in at least one newspaper of general 2 circulation in the director district as provided in chapter 3 618 . The cost of publication shall be paid by the area 4 education agency. 5 Sec. 33. Section 273.8, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 3. Director district convention. If no candidate files with 8 the area education agency secretary by the deadline specified 9 in subsection 2 , or a vacancy occurs, or if otherwise required 10 as provided in section 273.23, subsection 3 , a director 11 district convention, attended by members of the boards of 12 directors of the local school districts located within the 13 director district, shall be called to elect a board member 14 described in subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , for that director 15 district. The convention location shall be determined by the 16 area education agency administrator. Notice of the time, 17 date, and place of a director district convention shall be 18 published by the area education agency administrator in at 19 least one newspaper of general circulation in the director 20 district as provided in chapter 618 at least thirty days prior 21 to the day of the convention. The cost of publication shall be 22 paid by the area education agency. A candidate for election 23 to the area education agency board shall file a statement 24 of candidacy with the area education agency secretary at 25 least ten days prior to the date of the director district 26 convention on forms prescribed by the department of education, 27 or nominations may be made at the convention by a delegate from 28 a board of directors of a school district located within the 29 director district. A statement of candidacy shall include the 30 candidateâs name, address, and school district. Delegates to 31 director district conventions shall not be bound by a school 32 board or any school board member to pledge their votes to any 33 candidate prior to the date of the convention. 34 Sec. 34. Section 273.27, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 35 -15- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 15/ 51 S.F. 2131 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 2 proposal with the affected area education agency board, the 3 affected board shall fix a date for a hearing on the proposal, 4 which shall not be more than sixty days after the dissolution 5 petition was filed with the affected board. The affected board 6 shall publish notice of the date, time, and location of the 7 hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing by 8 one publication in a newspaper in general circulation in the 9 area as provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall include the 10 contents of the dissolution proposal. 11 Sec. 35. Section 275.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. Within ten days after the petition is filed, the area 14 education agency administrator shall fix a final date for 15 filing objections to the petition which shall be not more than 16 sixty days after the petition is filed and shall fix the date 17 for a hearing on the objections to the petition. Objections 18 shall be filed in the office of the administrator who shall 19 give notice at least ten days prior to the final day for 20 filing objections, by one publication in a newspaper published 21 within the territory described in the petition, or if none is 22 published in the territory, in a newspaper published in the 23 county where the petition is filed, and of general circulation 24 in the territory described as provided in chapter 618 . The 25 notice shall also list the date, time, and location for the 26 hearing on the petition as provided in section 275.15 . The 27 cost of publication shall be assessed to each district whose 28 territory is involved in the ratio that the number of pupils 29 in basic enrollment for the budget year, as defined in section 30 257.6 in each district bears to the total number of pupils 31 in basic enrollment for the budget year in the total area 32 involved. Objections shall be in writing in the form of an 33 affidavit and may be made by any person residing or owning land 34 within the territory described in the petition, or who would 35 -16- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 16/ 51 S.F. 2131 be injuriously affected by the change petitioned for and shall 1 be on file not later than 12:00 noon of the final day fixed for 2 filing objections. 3 Sec. 36. Section 275.15, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 4. The administrator shall at once publish the decision 6 in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in the same 7 manner in which the original notice was published. Within 8 twenty days after the publication, the decision rendered by the 9 area education agency board may be appealed to the district 10 court in the county involved by any school district affected. 11 For purposes of appeal, only those school districts who filed 12 reorganization petitions are school districts affected. An 13 appeal from a decision of an area education agency board or 14 joint area education agency boards under section 275.4 , 275.16 , 15 or this section is subject to appeal procedures under this 16 chapter and is not subject to appeal under chapter 290 . 17 Sec. 37. Section 275.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 2. Votes of each member of an area education agency board in 20 attendance shall be weighted so that the total number of votes 21 eligible to be cast by members of each board in attendance 22 shall be equal. However, if the joint boards cast a tie vote 23 and are unable to agree to a decision fixing the boundaries for 24 the proposed school corporation or to a decision to dismiss the 25 petition, the time during which actions must be taken under 26 section 275.15 shall be extended from ten days to fifteen days 27 after the conclusion of the hearing under section 275.15 , and 28 the joint board shall reconvene not less than ten and not more 29 than fifteen days after the conclusion of the hearing. At the 30 hearing the joint board shall reconsider its action and if a 31 tie vote is again cast it is a decision granting the petition 32 and changing the plans of any and all of the agency boards 33 affected by the petition and fixing the boundaries for the 34 proposed school corporation. The agency administrator shall 35 -17- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 17/ 51 S.F. 2131 at once publish the decision in the same newspaper as provided 1 in chapter 618 in the same manner in which the original notice 2 was published. 3 Sec. 38. Section 275.18, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 2. The county commissioner of elections shall give notice 6 of the election by one publication in the same newspaper as 7 provided in chapter 618 in the same manner in which previous 8 notices have been published regarding the proposed school 9 reorganization, and in addition, if more than one county 10 is involved, by one publication in a legal newspaper as 11 provided in chapter 618 in each county other than that of the 12 first publication. The publication shall be not less than 13 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. If 14 the decision published pursuant to section 275.15 or 275.16 15 includes a description of the proposed school corporation and 16 a description of the director districts, if any, the notice 17 for election and the ballot do not need to include these 18 descriptions. Notice for an election shall not be published 19 until the expiration of time for appeal, which shall be the 20 same as that provided in section 275.15 or 275.16 , whichever is 21 applicable; and if there is an appeal, not until the appeal has 22 been disposed of. 23 Sec. 39. Section 275.54, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 1. Within ten days following the filing of the dissolution 26 proposal with the board, the board shall fix a date for a 27 hearing on the proposal which shall not be more than sixty days 28 after the dissolution petition was filed with the board. The 29 board shall publish notice of the date, time, and location of 30 the hearing at least ten days prior to the date of the hearing 31 by one publication in a newspaper in general circulation in the 32 district as provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall include 33 the content of the dissolution proposal. A person residing or 34 owning land in the school district may present evidence and 35 -18- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 18/ 51 S.F. 2131 arguments at the hearing. The president of the board shall 1 preside at the hearing. The board shall review testimony from 2 the hearing and shall adopt or amend and adopt the dissolution 3 proposal. 4 Sec. 40. Section 275.55, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 2. The board shall give written notice of the election to 7 the county commissioner of elections. The county commissioner 8 of elections shall give notice of the election by one 9 publication in the same newspaper as provided in chapter 618 10 in the same manner in which the previous notice was published 11 about the hearing, which publication shall not be less than 12 four nor more than twenty days prior to the election. 13 Sec. 41. Section 279.36, Code 2026, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 279.36 Publication procedures and fee . 16 1. The requirements of section 279.35 are satisfied by 17 publication in at least one newspaper published in the district 18 or, if there is none, in at least one newspaper having general 19 circulation within the district as provided in chapter 618 . 20 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1989, and each 21 fiscal year thereafter, the fee for the publications shall be 22 the legal publication fee provided by section 618.11 . 23 Sec. 42. Section 303.44, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 24 is amended to read as follows: 25 The board of supervisors to whom the petition is addressed, 26 at its next regular, special, or adjourned meeting, shall set 27 the time and place when it will meet for a hearing upon the 28 petition, and direct the county auditor in whose office the 29 petition is filed to cause notice to be given to all persons 30 whom it may concern, without naming them, of the pendency 31 and prayer of the petition, by publication of a notice once 32 each week for two consecutive weeks in some newspaper of 33 general circulation published as provided in chapter 618 in 34 the proposed district. The last publication shall not be less 35 -19- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 19/ 51 S.F. 2131 than twenty days prior to the date set for the hearing of the 1 petition. If no such newspaper is published in the proposed 2 district, then notice shall be by posting at least five copies 3 of the notice in the proposed district at least twenty days 4 before the hearing. Proof of giving notice shall be made 5 by affidavit of the publisher or affidavit of the person who 6 posted the notices, and the proof shall be on file with the 7 county auditor at the time the hearing begins. The notice of 8 hearing shall be directed to all persons it may concern, and 9 shall state the following: 10 Sec. 43. Section 303.46, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 303.46 Notice of election. 13 In its order for the election the board of supervisors shall 14 direct the county auditor to cause notice of the election to 15 be given by posting at least five copies of the notice in 16 public places in the proposed district at least twenty days 17 before the date of election and by publication of the notice 18 once each week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of 19 general circulation published as provided in chapter 618 in the 20 proposed district , or, if no such newspaper is published within 21 the proposed district, then in such a newspaper published in 22 the county in which the major part of the proposed district is 23 located . The last publication is to be at least twenty days 24 prior to the date of election. The notice shall state the 25 time and place of holding the election and the hours when the 26 polls will be open and closed, the purpose of the election, 27 with the name of the proposed district and a description of 28 its boundaries, and shall set forth briefly the limits of each 29 voting precinct and the location of the polling places. Proof 30 of posting and publication shall be made in the manner provided 31 in section 303.44 and filed with the county auditor. 32 Sec. 44. Section 303.52, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 3. The board of trustees shall provide for the manner in 35 -20- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 20/ 51 S.F. 2131 which the land use plan shall be established and enforced and 1 amended, supplemented, or changed. However, a plan shall not 2 become effective until after a public hearing on it, at which 3 parties in interest and citizens of the district shall have an 4 opportunity to be heard. At least fifteen daysâ notice of the 5 time and place of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper 6 of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the 7 district giving the time, date, and location of the public 8 hearing. 9 Sec. 45. Section 306.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 306.12 Notice ââ service. 12 Notice of the hearing under section 306.11 shall be 13 published in a newspaper of general circulation as provided 14 in chapter 618 in the county or counties where the road is 15 located, not less than four nor more than twenty days prior 16 to the date of hearing. The agency which is holding the 17 hearing shall notify all adjoining property owners, all utility 18 companies whose facilities adjoin the road right-of-way or 19 are on the road right-of-way, and the department, boards of 20 supervisors, or agency in control of affected state lands, of 21 the time and place of the hearing, by certified mail. 22 Sec. 46. Section 309.96, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 2. In the event that a county secondary road budget or 25 amended budget thereto is disapproved by the department, the 26 county may elect either to revise such budget or amended budget 27 so as to receive approval or the county may elect to operate 28 with such disapproved budget or amended budget. In the event 29 the county secondary road budget is disapproved in whole or 30 in part, within twenty days after receipt of the departmentâs 31 report, the board of supervisors shall cause to be published in 32 the official newspapers of the county as provided in chapter 33 618 , notice of a public hearing to be held within ten days of 34 said publication, on the departmentâs recommendations, and at 35 -21- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 21/ 51 S.F. 2131 said hearing the board of supervisors shall amend or adopt 1 their original budget. 2 Sec. 47. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph g, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 g. If it is impossible to determine with reasonable 5 certainty the identities and addresses of the last registered 6 owner and all lienholders, notice by one publication in 7 one newspaper of general circulation in the area where the 8 vehicle was abandoned as provided in chapter 618 shall be 9 sufficient to meet all requirements of notice under this 10 section . The published notice may contain multiple listings of 11 abandoned vehicles but shall be published within the same time 12 requirements and contain the same information as prescribed for 13 mailed notice in this subsection . 14 Sec. 48. Section 321.236, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 b. Before establishing a rural residence district, the 17 board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the 18 proposal, notice of which shall be published in a newspaper 19 having a general circulation as provided in chapter 618 in the 20 area where the proposed district is located at least twenty 21 days before the date of hearing. The notice shall state the 22 time and place of the hearing, the proposed location of the 23 district, and other data considered pertinent by the board of 24 supervisors. 25 Sec. 49. Section 330A.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 26 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 Whenever the governing body of any municipality shall desire 28 to participate in the creation of an authority it shall adopt a 29 resolution signifying its intention to do so and shall publish 30 said resolution at least one time in a newspaper of general 31 circulation as provided in chapter 618 in such municipality 32 giving notice of a hearing to be held on the question of the 33 municipalityâs entry into such authority. Such resolution 34 shall be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 35 -22- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 22/ 51 S.F. 2131 hearing, and shall contain therein the following information: 1 Sec. 50. Section 330A.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. A municipality wishing to withdraw from or to become a 4 member of an existing authority shall signify its intention by 5 resolution and shall publish the resolution at least one time 6 in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 7 618 in the municipality giving notice of a hearing to be held 8 on the question of withdrawing or joining and its intention 9 to withdraw or join. The resolution shall be published at 10 least fourteen days prior to the date of the hearing. A 11 withdrawing municipality shall state in the resolution how it 12 intends to pay its portion of the outstanding obligations of 13 the authority, if any. A joining municipality shall state in 14 the resolution the information required in section 330A.6 . A 15 copy of the resolution shall be certified to the authority 16 by the municipality at least fourteen days in advance of the 17 hearing. The board shall by resolution indicate whether a 18 satisfactory provision has been made for the payment of the 19 outstanding obligations of the authority, as required under 20 subsection 1 . After the hearing and if the outstanding 21 obligations of the authority have been adequately provided for 22 by the municipality, the municipality may enact an ordinance to 23 withdraw from or join the authority. 24 Sec. 51. Section 330A.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 2. The proposed action of an authority, and the proposed 27 agreement to acquire, shall be approved by the governing 28 body of the owner of the aviation facilities. Whenever the 29 governing body of any municipality, airport commission, or 30 authority, shall desire to sell, lease, lend, grant, or convey 31 to the authority, any aviation facilities or any part or parts 32 thereof, as aforesaid, it shall adopt a resolution signifying 33 its intention to do so and shall publish said resolution 34 at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation as 35 -23- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 23/ 51 S.F. 2131 provided in chapter 618 in said municipality and in a newspaper 1 or newspapers , if necessary, of general circulation of in the 2 area served by said airport commission or authority giving 3 notice of a hearing to be held on the question of said sale, 4 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. Such resolution shall 5 be published at least fourteen days prior to the date of 6 hearing. After the hearing and if in the public interest, said 7 municipality shall enact an ordinance authorizing said sale, 8 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance and said airport commission 9 or authority shall pass a resolution authorizing said sale, 10 lease, loan, grant, or conveyance. 11 Sec. 52. Section 331.207, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 2. The petition shall be filed with the county commissioner 14 by June 1 of an odd-numbered year, subject to subsection 7 . 15 The special election shall be held on the first Tuesday after 16 the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered year. Notice 17 of the special election shall be published once each week for 18 three successive weeks in an official newspaper of the county 19 as provided in chapter 618 , shall state the representation 20 plans to be submitted to the electors, and shall state the 21 date of the special election. The last in the series of 22 publications shall occur not less than four nor more than 23 twenty days before the election. 24 Sec. 53. Section 331.302, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 8. A resolution becomes effective upon passage and an 27 ordinance or amendment becomes a law when a summary of the 28 ordinance or the complete text of the ordinance is published 29 as provided in chapter 618 , unless a subsequent effective date 30 is provided within the measure. As used in this subsection , 31 âsummaryâ shall mean a narrative description of the terms and 32 conditions of an ordinance setting forth the main points of 33 the ordinance in a manner calculated to inform the public in a 34 clear and understandable manner the meaning of the ordinance 35 -24- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 24/ 51 S.F. 2131 and which shall provide the public with sufficient notice to 1 conform to the desired conduct required by the ordinance. 2 The description shall include the title of the ordinance, 3 an accurate and intelligible abstract or synopsis of the 4 essential elements of the ordinance, a statement that the 5 description is a summary, the location and the normal business 6 hours of the office where the ordinance may be inspected, when 7 the ordinance becomes effective, and the full text of any 8 provisions imposing fines, penalties, forfeitures, fees, or 9 taxes. Legal descriptions of property set forth in ordinances 10 shall be described in full, provided that maps or charts may be 11 substituted for legal descriptions when they contain sufficient 12 detail to clearly define the area with which the ordinance is 13 concerned. The narrative description shall be written in a 14 clear and coherent manner and shall, to the extent possible, 15 avoid the use of technical or legal terms not generally 16 familiar to the public. When necessary to use technical or 17 legal terms not generally familiar to the public, the narrative 18 description shall include definitions of those terms. 19 Sec. 54. Section 331.305, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 1. Unless otherwise provided by state law, if notice of an 22 election, hearing, or other official action is required by this 23 chapter , the board shall publish the notice at least once, not 24 less than four nor more than twenty days before the date of the 25 election, hearing, or other action, in one or more newspapers 26 which meet the requirements of section 618.14 as provided in 27 chapter 618 . Notice of an election shall also comply with 28 section 49.53 . 29 Sec. 55. Section 331.385, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 2. The board of supervisors shall publish notice of the 32 proposed resolution, and of a public hearing to be held on the 33 proposed resolution, in a newspaper of general circulation as 34 provided in chapter 618 in the county at least ten days but no 35 -25- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 25/ 51 S.F. 2131 more than twenty days before the date of the public hearing. 1 If, after notice and hearing, the resolution is adopted, the 2 board of supervisors shall assume the exercise of the powers 3 and duties of township trustees relating to fire protection 4 service and emergency medical service as set forth in sections 5 359.42 through 359.45 . 6 Sec. 56. Section 331.425, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 5. Notice of the proposed special levy election shall be 9 published at least twice in a newspaper as specified in section 10 331.305 as provided in chapter 618 prior to the date of the 11 special levy election. The first notice shall appear as early 12 as practicable after the board has decided to seek a special 13 levy. 14 Sec. 57. Section 331.434, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, 15 are amended to read as follows: 16 3. Following, and not until, the requirements of section 17 24.2A are completed, the board shall set a time and place for 18 a public hearing on the budget before the final certification 19 date and shall publish notice of the hearing not less than ten 20 nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county 21 newspapers selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 22 618 . A summary of the proposed budget and a description of 23 the procedure for protesting the county budget under section 24 331.436 , in the form prescribed by the director of the 25 department of management, shall be included in the notice. 26 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 27 shall be filed with and preserved by the county auditor. A 28 levy is not valid unless and until the notice is published and 29 individual statements under section 24.2A are mailed. The 30 department of management shall prescribe the form for the 31 public hearing notice for use by counties. 32 6. The board shall appropriate, by resolution, the amounts 33 deemed necessary for each of the different county officers 34 and departments during the ensuing fiscal year. Increases 35 -26- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 26/ 51 S.F. 2131 or decreases in these appropriations do not require a budget 1 amendment, but may be provided by resolution at a regular 2 meeting of the board, as long as each class of proposed 3 expenditures contained in the budget summary published under 4 subsection 3 of this section is not increased. However, 5 decreases in appropriations for a county officer or department 6 of more than ten percent or five thousand dollars, whichever 7 is greater, shall not be effective unless the board sets a 8 time and place for a public hearing on the proposed decrease 9 and publishes notice of the hearing not less than ten nor more 10 than twenty days prior to the hearing in the county newspapers 11 selected under chapter 349 as provided in chapter 618 . 12 Sec. 58. Section 331.443, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a board may institute 15 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential county 16 purpose specified in section 331.441, subsection 2 , paragraph 17 âbâ , subparagraph (18) or (19), in an amount equal to or greater 18 than three million dollars by causing a notice of the proposal 19 to issue the bonds, including a statement of the amount 20 and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate of 21 interest which the bonds are to bear, and the right to petition 22 for an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper 23 of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the 24 county at least ten days prior to the meeting at which it is 25 proposed to take action for the issuance of the bonds. 26 Sec. 59. Section 341A.6, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 6. To arrange, compile, and administer competitive tests 29 to determine the relative qualifications of persons seeking 30 employment in any class of position and as a result thereof 31 establish eligible lists for the various classes of positions, 32 and provide that persons discharged because of curtailment of 33 expenditures, reduction in force, and for like causes, head 34 the list in the order of their seniority, to the end that they 35 -27- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 27/ 51 S.F. 2131 shall be the first to be reemployed. Notice of competitive 1 tests to be given shall be published at least two weeks prior 2 to holding the tests in a newspaper of general circulation as 3 provided in chapter 618 in the county or counties in which a 4 vacancy exists. 5 Sec. 60. Section 346.27, subsection 10, paragraph b, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 b. In addition to the notice required by section 49.53 , a 8 notice of the election shall be published once each week for 9 at least two weeks in some newspaper published in the county 10 as provided in chapter 618 stating the date of the election, 11 the hours the polls will be open, and a copy of the question. 12 The authority shall call this election with the concurrence of 13 both incorporating units. The election shall be conducted by 14 the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of chapters 15 49 and 50 . 16 Sec. 61. Section 347.7, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. The tax levy authorized by this section for operation 19 and maintenance of the hospital may be available in whole or in 20 part to any county with or without a county hospital organized 21 under this chapter , to be used to enhance rural health services 22 in the county. However, the tax levied may be expended for 23 enhancement of rural health care services only following a 24 local planning process. The department of health and human 25 services shall establish guidelines to be followed by counties 26 in implementing the local planning process which shall require 27 legal notice, public hearings, and a referendum in accordance 28 with this subsection prior to the authorization of any new levy 29 or a change in the use of a levy. The notice shall describe the 30 new levy or the change in the use of the levy, indicate the date 31 and location of the hearing, and shall be published at least 32 once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper having 33 general circulation as provided in chapter 618 in the county. 34 The hearing shall not take place prior to two weeks after the 35 -28- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 28/ 51 S.F. 2131 second publication. 1 Sec. 62. Section 349.16, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 2 is amended to read as follows: 3 There shall be published as provided in chapter 618 and in 4 each of the official newspapers at the expense of the county 5 during the ensuing year: 6 Sec. 63. Section 349.18, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 b. In addition to the requirements in paragraph âaâ , if 9 a county operates an internet site, the county auditor shall 10 post the full text of all resolutions adopted by the board 11 on the internet site as provided in chapter 618 . Any posted 12 summary or text of a full resolution shall include links 13 directing readers to information relevant to the content of the 14 resolution. 15 Sec. 64. Section 352.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 1. Within thirty days of receipt of a proposal to create 18 or expand an agricultural area which meets the statutory 19 requirements, the county board shall provide notice of the 20 proposal by publishing notice in a newspaper of general 21 circulation as provided in chapter 618 in the county. Within 22 forty-five days after receipt of the proposal, the county board 23 shall hold a public hearing on the proposal. 24 Sec. 65. Section 357A.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 2. If the supervisors find that required notice of the 27 hearing has been given and that the proposed district is 28 reasonably necessary for the public health, convenience, and 29 comfort of the residents, or may be of benefit in providing 30 fire protection, they shall make an order establishing the 31 district as a political subdivision, designating the districtâs 32 boundary, and identifying the district by name or number. The 33 order shall be published as provided in chapter 618 in the 34 same newspaper manner in which published the notice of hearing 35 -29- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 29/ 51 S.F. 2131 was published . The supervisors shall prepare and preserve 1 a complete record of the hearing on the petition and their 2 findings and action. 3 Sec. 66. Section 357A.11, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 b. Prior to such sale, conveyance, merger, or disposition by 6 the board that includes the relinquishment of the districtâs 7 right to provide service to an area, the board shall publish 8 notice of a public hearing not less than four nor more 9 than twenty days before the date fixed for the hearing in a 10 newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 in 11 the area for which the board seeks to relinquish service. The 12 board shall mail notice of a public hearing to the districtâs 13 members in the area for which the board seeks to relinquish 14 service not less than fourteen days prior to such public 15 hearing. A public hearing is not required when the board 16 relinquishes the districtâs right to service an area within the 17 corporate limits of a city if the city will provide service in 18 compliance with the cityâs annexation plan. 19 Sec. 67. Section 357A.24, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 b. The order shall be published as provided in chapter 618 22 in the same newspaper manner in which published the notice of 23 the hearing was published . 24 Sec. 68. Section 357B.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 357B.18 Detachment of land from district. 27 The trustees of a township, after notice and a public 28 hearing, may withdraw the township or part of the township 29 from a benefited fire district. Notice of the time, date and 30 place of the hearing shall be published at least two weeks 31 before the hearing in a newspaper having general circulation as 32 provided in chapter 618 within the township. The notice shall 33 also identify the area to be withdrawn. After the hearing on 34 the proposed withdrawal, the township trustees, by majority 35 -30- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 30/ 51 S.F. 2131 vote, may withdraw the township or a part of the township from 1 the benefited fire district. If the township trustees take 2 final action to withdraw on or before March 1 of a fiscal year, 3 the effective date of the withdrawal is the following July 1. 4 However, if final action to withdraw is taken after March 1, 5 the withdrawal is not effective until July 1 of the following 6 calendar year. If bonds issued under section 357B.4 are 7 outstanding at the time of withdrawal, the board of supervisors 8 shall continue to levy an annual tax against the taxable 9 property being withdrawn to pay its share of the outstanding 10 obligation of the district relating to those bonds. 11 Sec. 69. Section 358.40, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are 12 amended to read as follows: 13 3. The board shall examine the petition at its next meeting 14 after its filing or within twenty days of the filing, whichever 15 date is earlier. Within ten days of the meeting, the board 16 shall publish notice of the petition and the date, time, and 17 place of the meeting at which time the board proposes to take 18 action on the petition. The notice shall be published in a 19 newspaper of general circulation published in the district 20 and, if no newspaper is published within the district, in a 21 newspaper published in the county in which the major part of 22 the district is located as provided in chapter 618 . At the 23 boardâs meeting, or subsequent meetings as necessary, if the 24 petition is found to comply with the requirements of this 25 section and the board of trustees consents by majority vote, 26 the board of supervisors may provide for payment as requested 27 or modify the method of payment of costs and expenses. 28 4. If the board decides that dissolution is warranted for 29 the best interest of the public, it shall publish a notice in a 30 newspaper of general circulation published in the district or, 31 if no newspaper is published in the district, in a newspaper 32 published in the county in which the major part of the district 33 is located as provided in chapter 618 and give notice by mail 34 to all known claimants or creditors of the district that it 35 -31- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 31/ 51 S.F. 2131 will receive and adjudicate claims against the district for 1 four months from the date the notice is published and shall 2 levy an annual tax as necessary against all property in the 3 district for the number of years required to pay all claims 4 allowed. However, the annual tax levied under this subsection 5 shall not exceed four dollars per thousand dollars of assessed 6 valuation of the taxable property within the district at the 7 time of dissolution. The levy shall be made in the same manner 8 as provided in section 76.2 . After the board makes a specific 9 finding that all indebtedness, costs, and expenses have been 10 paid or levies approved for their payment, the board shall 11 dissolve the district by resolution entered upon its records. 12 The dissolution order shall be noted by the auditor on the 13 county records, showing the date when the dissolution became 14 effective. 15 Sec. 70. Section 359.52, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 a. The board of trustees shall set forth its proposal in a 18 resolution and shall publish notice of the resolution and of 19 a date, time, and place of a public hearing on the proposal. 20 The notice shall be published in a newspaper published at least 21 once weekly and having general circulation in the township or 22 in the largest city in the township as provided in chapter 618 . 23 The notice shall be published no less than ten days and no more 24 than twenty days before the hearing. 25 Sec. 71. Section 362.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 26 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 b. A publication required by the city code must be in a 28 newspaper published at least once weekly and having general 29 circulation in the city. However, if the city has a population 30 of two hundred or less, or in the case of ordinances and 31 amendments to be published in a city in which no newspaper is 32 published, a publication may be made by posting in three public 33 places in the city which have been permanently designated by 34 ordinance published as provided in chapter 618 . 35 -32- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 32/ 51 S.F. 2131 Sec. 72. Section 362.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 73. Section 364.2, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. Notice of the election shall be given by publication 5 as prescribed in section 49.53 in a newspaper of general 6 circulation in the city and chapter 618 . 7 Sec. 74. Section 364.4, subsection 4, paragraph e, 8 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 (a) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 11 into a lease or lease-purchase contract payable from the 12 general fund by causing a notice of the meeting to discuss 13 entering into the lease or lease-purchase contract, including 14 a statement of the principal amount and purpose of the lease 15 or lease-purchase contract and the right to petition for an 16 election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 17 general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the city 18 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 19 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 20 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 21 action to enter into the lease or lease-purchase contract. 22 Sec. 75. Section 368.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 368.4 Annexing moratorium. 25 A city, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 26 agree with another city or cities to refrain from annexing 27 specifically described territory for a period not to exceed 28 ten years and, following notice and hearing, may by resolution 29 extend the agreement for subsequent periods not to exceed ten 30 years each. Notice of a hearing shall be served by regular 31 mail at least thirty days before the hearing on the city 32 development board and on the board of supervisors of the county 33 in which the territory is located and shall be published in 34 an official county newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in 35 -33- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 33/ 51 S.F. 2131 each county containing a city conducting a hearing regarding 1 the agreement, in an official county newspaper in any county 2 within two miles of any such city, and in an official newspaper 3 of each city conducting a hearing regarding the agreement. 4 The notice shall include the time and place of the hearing, 5 describe the territory subject to the proposed agreement, 6 and the general terms of the agreement. After passage of a 7 resolution by the cities approving the agreements, a copy 8 of the agreement and a copy of any resolution extending an 9 agreement shall be filed with the city development board within 10 ten days of enactment. If such an agreement is in force, the 11 board shall dismiss a petition or plan which violates the terms 12 of the agreement. 13 Sec. 76. Section 368.7, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 d. The city shall provide for a public hearing on the 16 application before approving or denying it. The city shall 17 provide written notice at least fourteen business days prior 18 to any action by the city council regarding the application, 19 including a public hearing, by regular mail to the chairperson 20 of the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 21 portion of the territory proposed to be annexed, each public 22 utility which serves the territory proposed to be annexed, 23 each owner of property located within the territory to be 24 annexed who is not a party to the application, and each owner 25 of property that adjoins the territory to be annexed unless 26 the adjoining property is in a city. The city shall publish 27 notice of the application and public hearing on the application 28 in an official county newspaper in each county which contains 29 a portion of the territory proposed to be annexed as provided 30 in chapter 618 . Both the written and published notice shall 31 include the time and place of the public hearing and a legal 32 description of the territory to be annexed. The city shall 33 not assess the costs of providing notice as required in this 34 section to the applicants. The city council shall approve or 35 -34- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 34/ 51 S.F. 2131 deny the application by resolution of the council. 1 Sec. 77. Section 368.7, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 2 amended to read as follows: 3 2. An application for annexation of territory not within 4 an urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 5 annexation is directed must be approved by resolution of the 6 council which receives the application. The city council shall 7 mail a copy of the application by certified mail to the board 8 of supervisors of each county which contains a portion of the 9 territory at least fourteen business days prior to any action 10 taken by the city council on the application. The council 11 shall also publish notice of the application in an official 12 county newspaper in each county which contains a portion of the 13 territory as provided in chapter 618 at least fourteen days 14 prior to any action taken by the council on the application. 15 Upon receiving approval of the council, the city clerk shall 16 file a copy of the resolution, map, and legal description of 17 the territory involved with the secretary of state, the county 18 board of supervisors of each county which contains a portion 19 of the territory, each affected public utility, and the state 20 department of transportation. The city clerk shall also record 21 a copy of the legal description, map, and resolution with the 22 county recorder of each county which contains a portion of 23 the territory. The secretary of state shall not accept and 24 acknowledge a copy of a legal description, map, and resolution 25 of annexation which would create an island. The annexation is 26 completed upon acknowledgment by the secretary of state that 27 the secretary of state has received the legal description, map, 28 and resolution. 29 3. An application for annexation of territory within an 30 urbanized area of a city other than the city to which the 31 annexation is directed must be approved both by resolution of 32 the council which receives the application and by the board. 33 The board shall not approve an application which creates an 34 island. Notice of the application shall be mailed by certified 35 -35- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 35/ 51 S.F. 2131 mail, by the city to which the annexation is directed, at least 1 fourteen business days prior to any action by the city council 2 on the application to the council of each city whose boundary 3 adjoins the territory or is within two miles of the territory, 4 to the board of supervisors of each county which contains a 5 portion of the territory, each affected public utility, and 6 to the regional planning authority of the territory. Notice 7 of the application shall be published in an official county 8 newspaper in each county which contains a portion of the 9 territory as provided in chapter 618 at least ten business days 10 prior to any action by the city council on the application. 11 The annexation is completed when the board has filed and 12 recorded copies of applicable portions of the proceedings as 13 required by section 368.20, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . 14 Sec. 78. Section 368.11, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 5. Before a petition for involuntary annexation may be 17 filed, the petitioner shall hold a public meeting on the 18 petition. Notice of the meeting shall be published in an 19 official county newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in each 20 county which contains a part of the territory at least five 21 days before the date of the public meeting. The mayor of 22 the city proposing to annex the territory, or that personâs 23 designee, shall serve as chairperson of the public meeting. 24 The city clerk of the same city or the city clerkâs designee 25 shall record the proceedings of the public meeting. Any 26 person attending the meeting may submit written comments and 27 may be heard on the petition. The minutes of the public 28 meeting and all documents submitted at the public meeting 29 shall be forwarded to the county board of supervisors of each 30 county where the territory is located and to the board by the 31 chairperson of the meeting. 32 Sec. 79. Section 373.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 1. Within sixty days after its organization, the commission 35 -36- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 36/ 51 S.F. 2131 shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of 1 receiving information and material which will assist in the 2 drafting of a charter. Notice of the date, time, and place 3 of the hearing shall be published in the official county 4 newspapers of as provided in chapter 618 in each county in 5 which the participating cities are located. 6 Sec. 80. Section 384.16, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. Following, and not until, completion of requirements 9 of section 24.2A , the council shall set a time and place for 10 public hearing on the budget before the final certification 11 date and shall publish notice of the hearing pursuant to 12 section 362.3 in a newspaper published at least once weekly 13 and having general circulation in the city. However, if the 14 city has a population of two hundred or less, publication 15 may be made by posting in three public places in the city as 16 provided in chapter 618 . A summary of the proposed budget and 17 a description of the procedure for protesting the city budget 18 under section 384.19 , in the form prescribed by the director of 19 the department of management, shall be included in the notice. 20 Proof of publication of the notice under this subsection 3 must 21 be filed with the county auditor. The department of management 22 shall prescribe the form for the public hearing notice for use 23 by cities. 24 Sec. 81. Section 384.24A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 25 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 (1) The governing body must institute proceedings to enter 27 into a loan agreement payable from the general fund by causing 28 a notice of the meeting to discuss entering into the loan 29 agreement, including a statement of the principal amount and 30 purpose of the loan agreement and the right to petition for 31 an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper of 32 general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the city 33 at least ten days prior to the discussion meeting. No sooner 34 than thirty days following the discussion meeting shall the 35 -37- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 37/ 51 S.F. 2131 governing body hold a meeting at which it is proposed to take 1 action to enter into the loan agreement. 2 Sec. 82. Section 384.25, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. Notwithstanding subsection 2 , a council may institute 5 proceedings for the issuance of bonds for an essential 6 corporate purpose specified in section 384.24, subsection 3 , 7 paragraph âwâ or âxâ , in an amount equal to or greater than 8 three million dollars by causing a notice of the proposal 9 to issue the bonds, including a statement of the amount 10 and purpose of the bonds, together with the maximum rate of 11 interest which the bonds are to bear, and the right to petition 12 for an election, to be published at least once in a newspaper 13 of general circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the 14 city at least ten days prior to the meeting at which it is 15 proposed to take action for the issuance of the bonds. 16 Sec. 83. Section 384.26, subsection 5, paragraph a, 17 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 , a council 20 may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 21 for the issuance of bonds for a general corporate purpose by 22 causing a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including 23 a statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together 24 with the maximum rate of interest which the bonds are to bear, 25 and the right to petition for an election, to be published at 26 least once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided 27 in chapter 618 within the city at least ten days prior to 28 the meeting at which it is proposed to take action for the 29 issuance of the bonds subject to the following population-based 30 limitations, adjusted and published annually in January by the 31 department of management by applying the percentage change in 32 the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the most 33 recent available twelve-month period published in the federal 34 register by the United States department of labor, bureau of 35 -38- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 38/ 51 S.F. 2131 labor statistics: 1 Sec. 84. Section 384.84A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. The governing body of a city may institute proceedings 4 to issue revenue bonds for storm water drainage construction 5 projects under section 384.84, subsection 7 , by causing notice 6 of the proposed project, with a description of the proposed 7 project and a description of the formula for the determination 8 of the rate or rates applied to users for payment of the bonds, 9 and a description of the bonds and maximum rate of interest 10 and the right to petition for an election if the project meets 11 the requirement of subsection 2 , to be published at least once 12 in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in chapter 13 618 within the city at least thirty days before the meeting at 14 which the governing body proposes to take action to institute 15 proceedings for issuance of revenue bonds for the storm water 16 drainage construction project. 17 Sec. 85. Section 403.15, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 5. The mayor or chairperson of the board, as applicable, 20 shall designate a chairperson and vice chairperson from among 21 the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, 22 technical experts and such other agents and employees, 23 permanent and temporary, as it may require, and the agency may 24 determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For 25 such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or 26 retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to 27 transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall 28 file, with the local governing body, on or before September 29 30 of each year, a report of its activities for the preceding 30 fiscal year, which report shall include a complete financial 31 statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income and 32 operating expense as of the end of such fiscal year. At the 33 time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a 34 newspaper of general circulation , as provided in chapter 618, 35 -39- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 39/ 51 S.F. 2131 in the city or county, as applicable, a notice to the effect 1 that such report has been filed with the municipality, and that 2 the report is available for inspection during business hours in 3 the office of the city clerk or county auditor, as applicable, 4 and in the office of the agency. 5 Sec. 86. Section 403A.5, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 b. The mayor shall designate a chairperson and vice 8 chairperson from among the commissioners. An agency may employ 9 an executive director, technical experts and such other agents 10 and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, 11 and the agency may determine their qualifications, duties, 12 and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, 13 an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal 14 staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise 15 powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing 16 body, on or before September 30 of each year, a report of 17 its activities for the preceding fiscal year, which report 18 shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its 19 assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the 20 end of such fiscal year. At the time of filing the report, 21 the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation 22 a notice in the community a notice as provided in chapter 23 618 to the effect that such report has been filed with the 24 municipality, and that the report is available for inspection 25 during business hours in the office of the city clerk and in 26 the office of the agency. 27 Sec. 87. Section 403A.28, Code 2026, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 403A.28 Public hearing required. 30 The municipal housing agency shall not undertake any 31 low-cost housing project until such time as a public hearing 32 has been called, at which time the agency shall advise the 33 public of the name of the proposed project, its location, the 34 number of living units proposed and their approximate cost. 35 -40- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 40/ 51 S.F. 2131 Notice of the public hearing on the proposed project shall be 1 published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation 2 as provided in chapter 618 within the municipality, at least 3 fifteen days prior to the date set for the hearing. 4 Sec. 88. Section 419.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 419.9 Public hearing. 7 Prior to the issuance of any bonds under authority of this 8 chapter , the municipality shall conduct a public hearing on the 9 proposal to issue said bonds. Notice of intention to issue the 10 bonds, specifying the amount and purpose thereof and the time 11 and place of hearing, shall be published at least once not less 12 than fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the hearing in 13 a newspaper published and having a general circulation within 14 the municipality. If there is no newspaper published therein, 15 the notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the 16 county and having a general circulation in the municipality 17 as provided in chapter 618 . At the time and place fixed for 18 the public hearing the governing body of the municipality 19 shall give all local residents who appear at the hearing an 20 opportunity to express their views for or against the proposal 21 to issue the bonds and at the hearing, or any adjournment 22 thereof, shall adopt a resolution determining whether or not to 23 proceed with the issuance of the bonds. 24 Sec. 89. Section 422D.1, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. To be effective, the resolution declaring emergency 27 medical services to be an essential service shall be considered 28 and voted on for approval at two meetings of the board prior to 29 the meeting at which the resolution is to be finally approved 30 by a majority of the board by recorded vote, as defined in 31 section 331.101 . Notice of the first meeting of the board 32 at which the resolution is considered and voted on shall be 33 published not less than sixty days prior to the date of the 34 meeting in one or more newspapers that meet the requirements 35 -41- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 41/ 51 S.F. 2131 of section 618.14 as provided in chapter 618 . The board shall 1 not suspend or waive the requirements for approval of the 2 resolution or approval of the imposition of a tax under this 3 chapter . 4 Sec. 90. Section 423A.7, subsection 4, paragraph f, 5 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 (1) A city or county acting on behalf of an unincorporated 7 area may, in lieu of calling an election, institute proceedings 8 for the issuance of bonds under this section by causing 9 a notice of the proposal to issue the bonds, including a 10 statement of the amount and purpose of the bonds, together 11 with the maximum rate of interest which the bonds are to bear, 12 and the right to petition for an election, to be published at 13 least once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided 14 in chapter 618 within the city or unincorporated area at least 15 ten days prior to the meeting at which it is proposed to take 16 action for the issuance of the bonds. 17 Sec. 91. Section 423B.9, subsection 4, paragraph a, 18 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 (1) A bond issuer may institute proceedings for the issuance 20 of bonds by causing a notice of the proposal to issue the 21 bonds, including a statement of the amount and purpose of the 22 bonds, together with the maximum rate of interest which the 23 bonds are to bear, and the right to petition for an election, 24 to be published at least once in a newspaper of general 25 circulation as provided in chapter 618 within the political 26 subdivision or unincorporated area at least ten days prior to 27 the meeting at which it is proposed to take action for the 28 issuance of the bonds. 29 Sec. 92. Section 423F.3, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 d. The board secretary shall notify the county commissioner 32 of elections of the intent to take an issue to the voters 33 pursuant to paragraph âbâ or âcâ . The county commissioner 34 of elections shall publish the notices required by law for 35 -42- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 42/ 51 S.F. 2131 special or general elections as provided in chapter 618 , and 1 the election shall be held on a date specified in section 39.2, 2 subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . A majority of those voting on the 3 question must favor approval of the revenue purpose statement. 4 If the proposal is not approved, the school district shall 5 not submit the same or new revenue purpose statement to the 6 electors for a period of six months from the date of the 7 previous election. 8 Sec. 93. Section 423F.3, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 a. Prior to approving the use of revenues received under 11 this chapter for an athletic facility infrastructure project 12 within the scope of the school districtâs approved revenue 13 purpose statement or pursuant to subsection 4 for a school 14 district without an approved revenue statement, the board of 15 directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposal 16 for the athletic facility infrastructure project and hold an 17 additional public hearing on the issue of construction of the 18 athletic facility. Notice of the time and place of the public 19 hearing shall be published not less than ten nor more than 20 twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper which is 21 a newspaper of general circulation in the school district as 22 provided in chapter 618 . If at any time prior to the fifteenth 23 day following the hearing, the secretary of the board of 24 directors receives a petition containing the required number 25 of signatures and asking that the question of the approval of 26 the use of revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 27 project be submitted to the voters of the school district, 28 the board of directors shall either rescind the boardâs 29 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 30 infrastructure project or direct the county commissioner of 31 elections to submit the question to the registered voters of 32 the school district at an election held on a date specified 33 in section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . The petition 34 must be signed by eligible electors equal in number to not less 35 -43- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 43/ 51 S.F. 2131 than one hundred or thirty percent of the number of voters 1 at the last preceding election of school officials under 2 section 277.1 , whichever is greater. If a majority of those 3 voting on the question favors the use of the revenues for the 4 athletic facility infrastructure project, the board shall be 5 authorized to approve such use by resolution of the board. If 6 a majority of those voting on the question does not favor the 7 use of the revenues for the athletic facility infrastructure 8 project, the board of directors shall rescind the boardâs 9 resolution for the use of revenues for the athletic facility 10 infrastructure project. If a petition is not received by the 11 board of directors within the prescribed time period, the board 12 of directors may approve the use of revenues for the athletic 13 facility infrastructure project without voter approval. 14 Sec. 94. Section 423F.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Bonds issued on or after July 1, 2019, shall not be sold 17 at public sale as provided in chapter 75 , or at a private sale, 18 without notice and hearing. Notice of the time and place of 19 the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 20 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 21 which is a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 22 chapter 618 in the school district. 23 Sec. 95. Section 441.49, subsection 2, paragraph a, 24 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 On or before October 8 the county auditor shall cause to 27 be published in official newspapers of general circulation 28 as provided in chapter 618 the final equalization order. 29 The county auditor shall also notify each property owner or 30 taxpayer whose valuation has been increased by the final 31 equalization order by mail postmarked on or before October 32 8. The publication and the individual notice mailed to each 33 property owner or taxpayer whose valuation has been increased 34 shall include, in type larger than the remainder of the 35 -44- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 44/ 51 S.F. 2131 publication or notice, the following statements: 1 Assessed values are equalized by the department of revenue 2 every two years. Local taxing authorities determine the final 3 tax levies and may reduce property tax rates to compensate 4 for any increase in valuation due to equalization. If you 5 are not satisfied that your assessment as adjusted by the 6 equalization order is correct, you may file a protest against 7 such assessment with the board of review on or after October 8 9, to and including October 31. 9 Sec. 96. Section 446.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 2. Publication of the date, time, and place of the annual 12 tax sale shall be made once by the treasurer in at least one 13 official newspaper in the county as selected by the board of 14 supervisors and designated by the treasurer as provided in 15 chapter 618 at least one week, but not more than three weeks, 16 before the day of sale. The publication shall contain a 17 description of the parcel to be sold that is clear, concise, 18 and sufficient to distinguish the parcel to be sold from 19 all other parcels. All items offered for sale pursuant to 20 section 446.18 may be indicated by an âsâ or by an asterisk. 21 The publication shall also contain the name of the person 22 in whose name the parcel to be sold is taxed and the amount 23 delinquent for which the parcel is liable each year, the 24 amount of the interest and fees, and the amount of the service 25 fee as provided in section 446.10, subsection 2 , all to be 26 incorporated as a single sum. The publication shall contain a 27 statement that, after the sale, if the parcel is not redeemed 28 within the period provided in chapter 447 , the right to redeem 29 expires and a deed may be issued. 30 Sec. 97. Section 447.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 447.10 Service by publication ââ fees. 33 If notice in accordance with section 447.9 cannot be served 34 upon a person entitled to notice in the manner prescribed in 35 -45- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 45/ 51 S.F. 2131 that section, then the holder of the certificate of purchase 1 shall cause the required notice to be published once in an 2 official newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in the county. 3 If service is made by publication, the affidavit required by 4 section 447.12 shall state the reason why service in accordance 5 with section 447.9 could not be made. Service of notice 6 by publication shall be deemed complete on the day of the 7 publication. Fees for publication, if required under section 8 447.13 , shall not exceed the customary publication fees for 9 official county publications. 10 Sec. 98. Section 455B.305A, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 b. Prior to the siting of a proposed new sanitary landfill 13 or incinerator by a private agency disposing of waste which 14 the agency generates on property owned by the agency which is 15 located outside of the city limits and for which no county 16 zoning ordinance exists, the private agency shall cause written 17 notice of the proposal, including the nature of the proposed 18 facility, and the right of the owner to submit a petition for 19 formal siting of the proposed site, to be served either in 20 person or by mail on the owners and residents of all property 21 within two miles in each direction of the proposed local site 22 area. The owners shall be identified based upon the authentic 23 tax records of the county in which the proposed site is to be 24 located. The private agency shall notify the county board of 25 supervisors which governs the county in which the site is to 26 be located of the proposed siting, and certify that notices 27 have been mailed to owners and residents of the impacted area. 28 Written notice shall be published in the official newspaper, 29 as selected by the county board of supervisors pursuant to 30 section 349.1 , of the county in which the site is located as 31 provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall state the name and 32 address of the applicant, the location of the proposed site, 33 the nature and size of the development, the nature of the 34 activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed activity, 35 -46- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 46/ 51 S.F. 2131 and a description of the right of persons to comment on the 1 request. If two hundred fifty or a minimum of twenty percent, 2 whichever is less, of the owners and residents of property 3 notified submit a petition for formal review to the county 4 board of supervisors or if the county board of supervisors, on 5 the boardâs own motion, requires formal review of the proposed 6 siting, the private agency proposal is subject to the formal 7 siting procedures established pursuant to this section . 8 Sec. 99. Section 455B.305A, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 b. Written notice shall be published in the official 11 newspaper of the county in which the site is located as 12 provided in chapter 618 . The notice shall state the name and 13 address of the applicant, the location of the proposed site, 14 the nature and size of the development, the nature of the 15 activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed activity, 16 the date when the request for site approval will be submitted, 17 and a description of the right of persons to comment on the 18 request. 19 Sec. 100. Section 455B.305A, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 5. At least one public hearing shall be held by the city 22 council or county board of supervisors no sooner than ninety 23 days but no later than one hundred twenty days from receipt of 24 the request for siting approval. A hearing shall be preceded 25 by published notice in an official newspaper of the county of 26 the proposed site, including in any official newspaper located 27 in the city of the proposed site as provided in chapter 618 . 28 Sec. 101. Section 459.304, subsection 2, paragraph a, 29 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 (1) The board shall publish a notice that the board has 31 received the application in a newspaper having a general 32 circulation in the county as provided in chapter 618 . 33 Sec. 102. Section 465C.11, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -47- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 47/ 51 S.F. 2131 3. Before the department shall make a finding of imperative 1 and unavoidable public necessity, or shall enter into any 2 amendment to articles of dedication, the department shall 3 provide notice of such proposal and opportunity for any person 4 to be heard. Such notice shall be published at least once in a 5 newspaper with a general circulation in the county or counties 6 wherein the area directly affected is situated as provided 7 in chapter 618 , and mailed within ten days of such published 8 notice to all persons who have requested notice of all such 9 proposed actions. Each notice shall set forth the substance 10 of the proposed action and describe, with or without legal 11 description, the area affected, and shall set forth a place and 12 time not less than sixty days thence for all persons desiring 13 to be heard to have reasonable opportunity to be heard prior to 14 the finding of the department. 15 Sec. 103. Section 468.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 468.34 Advertisement for bids. 18 The board shall publish notice once each week for two 19 consecutive weeks in a newspaper published as provided in 20 chapter 618 in the county where the improvement is located, 21 and publish additional advertisement and publication elsewhere 22 as the board may direct. The notice shall state the time and 23 place of letting the work of construction of the improvement, 24 specifying the approximate amount of work to be done in each 25 numbered section of the district, the time fixed for the 26 commencement, and the time of the completion of the work, that 27 bids will be received on the entire work and in sections or 28 divisions of it, and that a bidder will be required to deposit 29 a bid security with the county auditor as provided in section 30 468.35 . All notices shall set the date that bids will be 31 received and upon which the work will be let. However, when 32 the estimated cost of the improvement is less than the adjusted 33 competitive bid threshold, the board may let the contract for 34 the construction without taking bids and without publishing 35 -48- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 48/ 51 S.F. 2131 notice. 1 Sec. 104. Section 468.82, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 468.82 Payment. 4 The board, at the time of making the levy, shall fix a time 5 within which all assessments in excess of one hundred dollars 6 may be paid, and before any bonds are issued, publish notice 7 in an official newspaper as provided in chapter 618 in the 8 county where the district is located, of such time. After the 9 expiration of such time, no assessments may be paid except 10 in the manner and at the times fixed by the board in the 11 resolution authorizing the issue of the bonds. 12 Sec. 105. Section 468.257, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 3. Except as otherwise required by section 468.16 , the 15 notice required by this section shall be served by publication 16 once in a newspaper of general circulation as provided in 17 chapter 618 in each county in which the overlying districtâs 18 land is situated. The publication shall be made not less than 19 twenty days prior to the day set for the hearing. Proof of 20 service shall be made by affidavit of the publisher. 21 Sec. 106. Section 468.507, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 468.507 Notice of election. 24 The board, or, if in more than one county, the boards 25 acting jointly, shall cause notice of said election to be 26 given, setting forth the time and place of holding the same 27 and the hours when the polls will open and close. Such notice 28 shall be published for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper 29 in which the official proceedings of the board are published 30 as provided in chapter 618 in the county, or if the district 31 extends into more than one county, then in such newspaper of 32 as provided in chapter 618 in each county. The last of such 33 publications shall not be less than ten days before the date 34 of said election. 35 -49- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 49/ 51 S.F. 2131 Sec. 107. Section 533.320, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The sale shall be held at the time and place specified 3 in a notice published prior to the sale once each week for 4 two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation 5 published in the city or unincorporated area in which the state 6 credit union has its principal place of business, or if there 7 is none, a newspaper of general circulation published in the 8 county, or in a county adjoining the county, in which the state 9 credit union has its principal place of business as provided 10 in chapter 618 . 11 Sec. 108. Section 556.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. Provide for the publication annually of at least one 14 notice not later than the following November 30. Each notice 15 may be published at least once each week for two successive 16 weeks in an English language newspaper of general circulation 17 in the county in this state in which is located the last known 18 address of any person to be named in the notice as provided in 19 chapter 618 . If an address is not listed or if the address is 20 outside this state, the notice may be published in the county 21 in which the holder of the abandoned property has its principal 22 place of business within this state. 23 Sec. 109. Section 618.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 2. If no newspaper meeting the requirements of subsection 26 1 , paragraphs âaâ through âdâ , is published in the jurisdiction 27 of a governmental entity, the governmental entity may satisfy 28 public notice requirements through publication on the statewide 29 public notice internet site established pursuant to section 30 618.3A, if such an internet site exists, and in either a 31 newspaper meeting the requirements of subsection 1 , paragraphs 32 âaâ and âcâ , and on the statewide public notice internet site 33 established pursuant to section 618.3A , if such an internet 34 site exists or on the internet site of a radio station that 35 -50- LSB 5180XS (5) 91 ss/jh 50/ 51 S.F. 2131 broadcasts in the jurisdiction of the governmental entity . 1 Sec. 110. Section 618.11, Code 2026, is amended by adding 2 the following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. The operator of a radio station with 4 an internet site selected for publication pursuant to section 5 618.3, subsection 2, shall charge a rate of not less than 6 ten dollars nor more than twenty-five dollars for posting an 7 official publication. 8 Sec. 111. Section 618.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 2. A newspaper or internet site of a radio station shall not 11 charge a fee to a government body, as defined in section 22.1 , 12 for proof of publication of a public notice. 13